Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

197.990.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS 197.200 to 197.250 for which no other penalty is herein provided, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or confined in jail for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year, or both.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 8.